South Dakota, session 2026, HB1295.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 31-19-1 be AMENDED:
31-19-1. The land or material for a right-of-way and borrow pit may be acquired
for the state by good faith negotiations by the Department of Transportation, either by
gift, or purchase, or condemnation. If said the land or material is to be acquired by
condemnation, the proceedings shall must be as provided by § 31-19-3.
Section 2. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 31-19:
The land or material for from a borrow pit may be acquired for the state by good
faith negotiations by the Department of Transportation, either by gift, or purchase, or
condemnation. If the land or material is acquired by condemnation, the proceedings must
be as provided by § 31-19-3.
Section 3. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 31-19:
If the Department of Transportation is to acquire an easement or right of way for
a borrow pit, the department must file a notice with the landowner and the register of
deeds for the county in which the easement or right of way is located. The notice must
state the purpose for the easement or right of way and state that just compensation must
be paid to the landowner, as negotiated.
The notice must include the department's plans for the easement or right of way,
and a detailed description of the property through, or over which, the proposed
improvement is to be constructed.
All persons having an interest in, or a lien upon the property must be provided with
a copy of the notice, insofar as those persons may be known at the time of the filing.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

1295A 2 1295
Upon agreement between a landowner and the department for the purchase of the
easement and finalization of the sale, the county register of deeds shall record the
easement or right of way. If negotiations fail, the requirements for condemnation, as set
forth in §§ 31-19-2 to 31-19-19, inclusive, initiating condemnation pursuant to § 31-19-
3, apply.
Section 4. That § 31-19-2 be AMENDED:
31-19-2. Before acquiring land or material by gift, purchase, or condemnation,
the Department of Transportation shall, by resolution, declare the necessity for acquiring
the land or material and file a copy of the resolution with the office of right-of-way in the
department.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.